Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 2. Mobile Home Park Act
38-12-212.3.
Responsibilities of landlord - acts prohibited.

Except as otherwise provided in this section:

In any rental agreement, the landlord is deemed to covenant, warrant, and maintain, throughout the period of the tenancy described in the rental agreement, premises that are safe, clean, fit for human habitation and reasonable use, and accessible to people with disabilities;

A landlord is responsible for and shall pay the cost of the maintenance and repair of any sewer lines, water lines, utility service lines, or related connections owned and provided by the landlord to the utility pedestal or pad space for a mobile home located in the park; and

A landlord shall ensure that:

All plumbing lines and other utility connections owned and provided by the landlord to the utility pedestal or pad space for each mobile home in the park have plumbing and utility connections that conformed to applicable law in effect at the time they were installed and are maintained in good working order;

Each pad space is connected to a sewage disposal system approved under applicable law; and

Running water and reasonable amounts of water are furnished at all times to each utility pedestal or pad space; except that a landlord need not satisfy the conditions described in this subsection (1)(a)(III)(C) if a mobile home is individually metered and the tenant occupying the mobile home fails to pay for water services; the local government in which the mobile home park is situated shuts off water service to a mobile home for any reason; weather conditions present a likelihood that water pipes will freeze, water pipes to a mobile home are wrapped in heated pipe tape, and the utility company has shut off electrical service to a mobile home for any reason or the heat tape malfunctions for any reason; running water is not available for any other reason outside the landlord’s control to prevent through reasonable and timely maintenance; or the landlord is making repairs or improvements to the items described in subsection (1)(a)(II) of this section, the landlord has provided reasonable advance notice to the mobile home residents of a service disruption that is required in connection with the repairs or improvements, and the service disruption continues for no longer than twenty-four hours.

If a landlord fails to maintain or repair the items described in subsection (1)(a)(II) of this section:

The landlord is responsible for and shall pay the cost of repairing any damage to a mobile home or mobile home lot that results from the failure;

The landlord is responsible for and shall pay the cost of providing alternative sources of potable water and maintaining portable toilets, which portable toilets are located reasonably near affected mobile homes in a manner that renders them accessible to people with disabilities, no later than twenty-four hours after the service disruption begins, unless conditions beyond the landlord’s control prevent compliance with this subsection (1)(b)(II); and

The landlord shall reimburse residents for any damages to their persons or property, for any loss of use of their property, and for any expenses that they reasonably incur as a result of the failure.

A landlord shall give a minimum of forty-eight hours’ notice to residents if water service will be disrupted for more than two hours for planned improvements, maintenance, or repairs. The landlord shall attempt to give a reasonable amount of notice to residents if water service will be disrupted for any other reasons unless conditions are such that providing the notice would result in property damage, health, or safety concerns or when conditions otherwise require emergency repair.

In addition to the responsibilities described in subsection (1)(a) of this section, a landlord is responsible for:

Any accessory buildings or structures, including sheds and carports, that are owned by the landlord and provided for the use of the residents; and

The premises, including:

Maintaining all common areas in clean condition, good repair, and in compliance with applicable health and safety laws; keeping common areas and facilities generally available for use by park residents; and keeping common areas accessible to people with disabilities;

Maintaining roads and other pavement owned by the landlord in a passable, safe condition that is sufficient to provide access for residents’ vehicles, emergency vehicles, vans providing transportation services to persons who are elderly or disabled, and school buses, if applicable, which maintenance includes snow removal, ensuring adequate drainage, and maintaining pavement above water lines;

Maintaining lot grades, regrading lots as necessary to prevent the accumulation of stagnant water and the detrimental effects of moving water, and taking reasonably necessary steps to maintain the integrity of the foundation of each mobile home’s utility pedestal or pad space in order to prevent structural damage to the mobile home, except in circumstances where the need for such maintenance is caused by a resident’s actions; and

Maintaining trees on the premises in a manner that protects the safety of residents of the park and their property, including the preservation of healthy, mature trees that home owners reasonably expected to remain on the premises when they signed their rental agreements, so long as such preservation does not pose a safety risk to any person, property, or infrastructure.

A landlord shall not require a resident to assume any of the responsibilities described in subsection (1) or (2) of this section as a condition of any home owner’s tenancy in the park.

Nothing in this section may be construed as:

Limiting the liability of an individual for the cost of repairing any damage caused by the individual to the landlord’s property or other property located in the park; or

Restricting a landlord from requiring a home owner to comply with rules and regulations of the park that are enforceable pursuant to section 38-12-214 or with terms of the rental agreement and any covenants binding upon the landlord or home owner, including covenants running with the land that pertain to the cleanliness of the home owner’s lot and routine lawn and yard maintenance, and excluding major landscaping projects.

A landlord shall establish and maintain an emergency contact number, post the number in common areas of the park, and communicate the number to home owners in each rental agreement and each revision of the park rules and regulations. A home owner who uses the emergency contact number in a timely manner to report a problem with a condition described in subsection (1) or (2) of this section is deemed to have provided notice to the landlord of the problem.

If a landlord fails to comply with the requirements of this section, a home owner of the park may file a complaint with the division of housing pursuant to the “Mobile Home Park Act Dispute Resolution and Enforcement Program” created in section 38-12-1104. If the division finds by a written determination that the landlord has violated this section, the division may:

Impose penalties, as described in section 38-12-1105 (5);

Issue an order to cease and desist, as described in section 38-12-1105 (6);

Require the landlord to reduce the rent owed by a home owner on a prorated basis to reflect the home owner’s loss of use of the mobile home space; or

Require the landlord to compensate a home owner for housing expenses on a per diem basis if the home owner is displaced from the home owner’s mobile home as a result of the landlord’s violation.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 1679, § 1, effective April 19.

L. 2010:

(1)(a)(I) and (1)(b) amended and (1)(c) added, (SB 10-156), ch. 343, p. 1589, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1196), ch. 195, p. 919, § 10, effective June 30.

38-12-212.4.
Required disclosure and notice of water usage and billing - responsibility for leaks.

If the management charges home owners individually for water usage in the park, then, on or before January 31 of each year, the management shall provide to each home owner and post in a clearly visible location in at least one common area of the mobile home park the following information:

The methodology by which the management calculates the amount charged to each home owner for water usage on the home owner’s lot;

The methodology by which the management calculates the amount charged to each home owner for water usage in common areas of the mobile home park; and

The current residential water rate schedule of the water utility or municipal water service provider that supplies water to the park.

If the management charges home owners for water usage in the park, whether individually or in an aggregate amount, the management shall provide to each home owner a monthly water bill that indicates the amount owed by the home owner, the total amount owed by all the residents in the mobile home park, and, if the management purchases the water from a provider, the total amount paid by the management to the provider.

The management shall not charge a home owner for any costs in addition to the actual cost of water billed to the management.

The management shall use a methodology that is reasonable, equitable, and consistent for billing home owners for any type of water usage.

If the management learns of a leak in a water line inside the park, the management shall notify each home owner of the leak within twenty-four hours.

The management shall not bill a home owner for any water usage that is caused by a leak in a water line inside the park.

History.

Source:
L. 2020:

Entire section added, (HB 20-1196), ch. 195, p. 922, § 11, effective June 30.

38-12-212.5.
Prohibition on retaliation.

The management shall not take retaliatory action against a home owner who exercises any right conferred upon the home owner by this part 2, part 11 of this article 12, or any other provision of law.

Except as described in subsection (3) of this section, in an action or administrative proceeding by or against a home owner, the management’s action is presumed to be retaliatory if, within the one hundred twenty days preceding the management’s action, the home owner:

Complained or expressed an intention to complain to a governmental agency about a matter relating to the mobile home park;

Submitted a complaint to the management about a violation described in this part 2;

Organized or became a member of a tenants’ association or similar organization; or

Made any other effort to secure or enforce any of the rights or remedies provided by this part 2 or any other provision of law.

The presumption of retaliatory action described in subsection (2) of this section does not apply to an action or administrative hearing where the management:

Addresses nonpayment of rent by a home owner, as described in section 38-12-204; or

Was notified by a peace officer or otherwise became aware that the mobile home that is the basis of the administrative hearing was being operated as an illegal drug laboratory, as defined in section 25-18.5-101 (8).

The management may rebut a presumption of retaliation with sufficient evidence of a nonretaliatory purpose.

The rights and remedies provided by this section are available to home owners in addition to the anti-retaliation protection provided in section 38-12-1105 (13).

History.

Source:
L. 2020:

Entire section added, (HB 20-1196), ch. 195, p. 922, § 11, effective June 30.

38-12-212.7.
Landlord utilities account.

Whenever a landlord contracts with a utility for service to be provided to a resident, the usage of which is to be measured by a master meter or other composite measurement device, such landlord shall remit to the utility all moneys collected from each resident as payment for the resident’s share of the charges for such utility service within forty-five days of the landlord’s receipt of payment.

If a landlord fails to timely remit utility moneys collected from residents as required by subsection (1) of this section, such utility may, after written demand therefor is served upon the landlord, require the landlord to deposit an amount equal to the average daily charge for the usage of such utility service for the preceding twelve months multiplied by the sum of ninety.

Any utility which prevails in an action brought to enforce the provisions of this section shall be entitled to an award of its reasonable attorney fees and court costs.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 1679, § 1, effective April 19.

38-12-213.
Rental agreement - disclosure of terms in writing - prohibited provisions.

The management shall adequately disclose the terms and conditions of a tenancy in writing in a rental agreement to any prospective home owner before the rental or occupancy of a mobile home space or lot. The disclosures must include:

The term of the tenancy and the amount of rent therefor, subject to the requirements of subsection (4) of this section;

The day rental payment is due and payable;

The day when unpaid rent is considered in default for the purpose of establishing a late fee, which day may not be less than ten calendar days after the day rent is due and payable;

The rules and regulations of the park then in effect;

The name and mailing address where a manager’s decision can be appealed; and

All charges to the home owner other than rent, including late fees.

Said rental agreement shall be signed by both the management and the home owner, and each party shall receive a copy thereof.

The management and the home owner may include in a rental agreement terms and conditions not prohibited by this part 2.

The terms of tenancy shall be specified in a written rental agreement subject to the following conditions:

The standard rental agreement shall be for a month-to-month tenancy.

Upon written request by the home owner to the landlord, the landlord shall allow a rental agreement for a fixed tenancy of not less than one year if the home owner is current on all rent payments and is not in violation of the terms of the then-current rental agreement; except that an initial rental agreement for a fixed tenancy may be for less than one year in order to ensure conformity with a standard anniversary date. A landlord shall not evict or otherwise penalize a home owner for requesting a rental agreement for a fixed period.

A landlord may, in the landlord’s discretion, allow a lease for a fixed period of longer than one year. In such circumstances, the requirements of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (4) shall not apply.

A rental agreement may not include any provision:

By which a home owner waives any rights created by this part 2 or part 11 of this article 12;

That requires a home owner to agree to a possessory lien;

That binds a home owner to arbitration in lieu of a civil trial; or

That authorizes a third person to confess judgment on a claim that arises from the rental agreement, this part 2, or part 11 of this article 12.

Any provision of a rental agreement that is prohibited by subsection (5) of this section is against public policy, unenforceable, and void.

History.

Source:
L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1815, § 9, effective June 9.

L. 87:

IP(1), (1)(f), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1314, § 12, effective May 8.

L. 2005:

(1)(a) amended and (4) added, p. 109, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2020:

(5) and (6) added, (HB 20-1196), ch. 195, p. 924, § 12, effective June 30.

L. 2021:

(6) amended, (SB 21-266), ch. 423, p. 2806, § 37, effective July 2; IP(1), (1)(c), (1)(e), and (1)(f) amended, (SB 21-173), ch. 349, p. 2268, § 10, effective October 1.

38-12-214.
Rules and regulations - amendments - notice - complaints.

The management shall adopt written rules and regulations concerning home owners’ use and occupancy of the premises. Except as otherwise provided in this section, such rules and regulations are enforceable against a home owner only if:

Their purpose is to promote the safety or welfare of the home owners, protect and preserve the premises from abuse, or make a fair distribution of services and facilities held out for the home owners generally;

They are reasonably related to a legitimate purpose, for which they are adopted;

They are not arbitrary, capricious, unreasonable, retaliatory, or discriminatory in nature;

They are sufficiently explicit in prohibition, direction, or limitation of each home owner’s conduct to fairly inform each home owner of what the home owner must do or not do to comply; and

They are established in the rental agreement at the inception of the tenancy, amended subsequently with the consent of the home owner, or, except as described in subsection (2) of this section, amended subsequently without the consent of the home owner after the management has provided written notice of the amendments to the home owner at least sixty days before the amendments become effective, and, if applicable, enforced in compliance with subsection (3) of this section.

When a mobile home is owned by a person other than the owner of the mobile home park in which the mobile home is located, the mobile home is a separate unit of ownership, and rules and regulations that impose restrictions or requirements on that separate unit that are adopted after the home owner signs the rental agreement and without the consent of the home owner are presumed unreasonable. Nothing in this subsection (2) prohibits the management from requiring compliance with park rules and regulations at the time of sale or transfer to a new owner; except that, as used in this subsection (2), “transfer” does not include a transfer of ownership pursuant to death or divorce or a transfer of ownership to a new co-owner pursuant to marriage.

If the management provides each home owner written notice of the management’s intent to add or amend any written rule or regulation as described in subsection (1)(e) of this section, a home owner may file a complaint challenging the rule, regulation, or amendment pursuant to section 38-12-1105 within sixty days after receiving the notice. If a home owner files such a complaint, and the new or amended rule or regulation will increase a cost to the home owner in an amount that equals or exceeds ten percent of the home owner’s monthly rent obligation under the rental agreement, the management shall not enforce the rule, regulation, or amendment unless and until the parties reach an agreement concerning the rule, regulation, or amendment or the dispute resolution process concludes and the division of housing within the department of local affairs issues a written determination, pursuant to section 38-12-1105 (4), that the rule, regulation, or amendment does not constitute a violation of this part 2 and may be enforced. Notwithstanding any provision of part 11 of this article 12 to the contrary, as part of the complaint process described in section 38-12-1105, the management has the burden of establishing that the rule, regulation, or amendment satisfies the requirements described in subsection (1) of this section.

Nothing in this section precludes a home owner from filing a complaint, pursuant to section 38-12-1105, concerning a rule or regulation at any time after the rule or regulation takes effect.

Rules and regulations that concern recreational facilities may be amended at the reasonable discretion of the management.

History.

Source:
L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1816, § 9, effective June 9.

L. 87:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (1)(d) amended, p. 1315, § 13, effective May 8.

L. 92:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1128, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1196), ch. 195, p. 924, § 13, effective June 30.

38-12-215.
New developments and parks - rental of sites to dealers authorized.

The management of a new mobile home park or manufactured housing community development may require as a condition of leasing a mobile home site or manufactured home site for the first time such site is offered for lease that the prospective lessee has purchased a mobile home or manufactured home from a particular seller or from any one of a particular group of sellers.

A licensed mobile home dealer or a manufactured home dealer may, by contract with the management of a new mobile home park or manufactured housing community development, be granted the exclusive right to first-time rental of one or more mobile home sites or manufactured home sites.

History.

Source:
L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1816, § 9, effective June 9.

38-12-216.
Mediation, when permitted - court actions.

In any controversy between the management and a home owner of a mobile home park arising out of the provisions of this part 2, except for the nonpayment of rent or in cases in which the health or safety of other home owners is in imminent danger, such controversy may be submitted to mediation by either party prior to the filing of a forcible entry and detainer lawsuit upon agreement of the parties.

The agreement, if one is reached, shall be presented to the court as a stipulation. Either party to the mediation may terminate the mediation process at any time without prejudice.

If either party subsequently violates the stipulation, the other party may apply immediately to the court for relief.

History.

Source:
L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1815, § 9, effective June 9; (2) amended, p. 2034, § 54, effective July 14.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 1315, § 14, effective May 8.

38-12-217.
Notice of change of use - notice of sale or closure of park - opportunity for home owners to purchase - procedures - exemptions.

Except as specified in subsection (12) of this section:

A mobile home park owner shall notify the owners of all mobile homes in the park and the municipality in which the park is situated or, if none, the county in which the park is situated of the park owner’s intent to change the use of the land comprising the park or to sell the park.

If a mobile home park owner intends to change the use of the land comprising the mobile home park, the mobile home park owner shall give written notice to each home owner at least twelve months before the change in use will occur. The mobile home park owner shall mail the written notice to each home owner at the home owner’s most recent address and shall post a copy of the notice in a conspicuous place on the mobile home or at the main point of entry to the lot.

No earlier than thirty days after giving the notice required by this subsection (1) or subsection (2) of this section, a mobile home park owner may post information in a public space in the mobile home park describing the method for providing a signed writing to the mobile home park owner related to the opportunity to purchase. The posting may include standard forms related to the opportunity to purchase, including a form for providing notice that a home owner does not wish to participate in efforts to purchase a community. If, no earlier than thirty days after a mobile home park owner provides the notice required by this subsection (1) or subsection (2) of this section, at least fifty percent of the home owners who reside in the park provide signed writings to the mobile home park owner expressing no interest in purchasing the park, then the opportunity to purchase provided by subsection (4) of this section shall terminate even if the ninety-day period provided for in subsection (4)(a) of this section has not yet elapsed.

A mobile home park owner shall not solicit or request a home owner’s intention or a signed writing related to the opportunity to purchase during the initial thirty days after giving notice pursuant to this subsection (1) or subsection (2) of this section. At no time during the time period for considering an opportunity to purchase shall a mobile home park owner attempt to coerce or provide any financial or in-kind incentives to a home owner to influence the homeowner’s decision. Any complaints alleging violation of this subsection (1) may be resolved under part 11 of this article 12.

Notice - when required. In addition to the notice specified in subsection (1) of this section, and except as specified in subsection (12) of this section:

A landlord shall give notice to each home owner in the mobile home park upon any of the following triggering events:

The landlord lists the park for sale;

The landlord intends to make a final, unconditional acceptance of an offer for the sale or transfer of the park; or

The landlord receives:

A notice of election and demand or lis pendens related to foreclosure of the park pursuant to part 1 of article 38 of this title 38; or

Notice that a certificate of levy has been filed related to the park pursuant to section 13-56-101.

Within fourteen days after the date on which any of the events described in subsection (2)(a) of this section occur, the landlord shall mail the notice required by this section by certified mail to:

Each home owner, using the most recent address of the home owner, and shall post a copy of the notice in a conspicuous place on the mobile home or at the main point of entry to the lot;

The municipality or, if the park is in an unincorporated area, the county within which the park is located;

The division of housing in the department of local affairs; and

Each home owners’ association, residents’ association, or similar body that represents the residents of the park.

Contents of notice. The notice given pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section must include notice of home owners’ rights under subsections (4) to (9) of this section. If the triggering event involves a sale, the notice must also include a description of the property to be purchased and the price, terms, and conditions of an acceptable offer the landlord has received to sell the mobile home park or the price or terms and conditions for which the landlord intends to sell the park. The information regarding the proposed sale and the price, terms, and conditions of an acceptable offer may be shared for the purposes of evaluating or obtaining financing for the prospective transaction, but all persons who receive the information shall otherwise keep it confidential if the park owner or the park owner’s agent so requests.

Offer to purchase - who may submit - time limits.

A group or association of home owners or their assignees have ninety days after the date that the landlord mails a notice under subsection (1) or (2) of this section to:

Submit to the landlord a proposed purchase and sale agreement; and

Obtain a binding commitment for any necessary financing or guarantees.

Notwithstanding subsection (4)(a) of this section, if a foreclosure sale of the park is scheduled for less than ninety days after the landlord mails a notice under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the opportunity granted by subsection (4)(a) of this section terminates on the date of the foreclosure sale.

A group or association of home owners or their assignees has the opportunity granted by subsection (4)(a) of this section if the group or association of home owners or their assignees have the approval of at least fifty-one percent of the home owners in the park. The group or association of home owners or their assignees must submit to the landlord reasonable evidence that the home owners of at least fifty-one percent of the occupied homes in the park have approved the group or association purchasing the park.

Landlord’s duty to consider offer. A landlord that receives an offer pursuant to this section shall not unreasonably refuse to:

Provide documents, data, and other information in response to reasonable requests for information from a group or association of home owners or their assignees participating in the opportunity to purchase that would enable them to prepare an offer. The documents, data, and other information provided may be shared for the purposes of evaluating or obtaining financing for the prospective transaction, but all persons who receive the information shall otherwise keep it confidential if the park owner or the park owner’s agent so requests.

Negotiate in good faith with a group or association of home owners or their assignees; or

Schedule a closing date for a purchase and sale agreement.

Expiration of opportunity to purchase.

If the ninety-day period provided for in subsection (4)(a) of this section elapses and a group or association of home owners or their assignees have not submitted a proposed purchase and sale agreement or obtained a binding financial commitment, the group’s or association’s opportunities provided by this section terminate.

A landlord shall give a group or association of home owners or their assignees an additional ninety days after the ninety-day period provided by subsection (4)(a) of this section to close on the purchase of the mobile home park.

Extension of time. The ninety-day periods described in subsections (4)(a) and (6)(b) of this section may be extended by written agreement between the landlord and the group or association of home owners or their assignees.

Assignment of right to purchase. A group or association of home owners or their assignees that have the opportunity to purchase under subsection (4) of this section may assign their purchase right to a local or state government, tribal government, housing authority, or nonprofit with expertise related to housing, or to an agency of the state, for the purpose of continuing the use of the park.

Independence of time limits and notice provisions.

Each occurrence of a triggering event listed in subsection (1) or (2) of this section creates an independent, ninety-day opportunity to purchase for the group or association of home owners or their assignees. If a ninety-day opportunity to purchase is in effect and a new triggering event occurs, the ongoing ninety-day time period terminates and a new ninety-day time period begins on the latest date on which the landlord gives notice, as required by subsection (1) or (2) of this section, of the new triggering event.

A notice required under this section is in addition to, and does not substitute for or affect, any other notice requirement under this part 2.

A landlord shall not make a final, unconditional acceptance of any offer for the sale or transfer of the park until:

The landlord has considered an offer made by a group or association of home owners or their assignees pursuant to subsections (4) and (5) of this section; or

The applicable period for exercise of the opportunity to purchase has expired pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.

Failure to complete transaction - affidavit of compliance. If the group or association of home owners or their assignees are not the successful purchaser of the park, the landlord shall provide evidence of compliance with this section by filing an affidavit of compliance with:

The municipality or, if the park is in an unincorporated area, the county, within which the park is located; and

The division of housing in the department of local affairs.

Exemptions from notice requirement. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, a landlord is not required to give notice or extend an opportunity to purchase to a group or association of home owners or their assignees if the sale, transfer, or conveyance of the mobile home park is:

To a spouse, a partner in a civil union, or a parent, sibling, aunt, uncle, first cousin, or legally recognized child of the landlord;

To a trust the beneficiaries of which are the spouse, partner in a civil union, or legally recognized children of the landlord;

To a business entity or trust that the transferring business entity or trust controls, directly or indirectly.

As used in this subsection (12)(c), “controls” means:

Owns entirely as a subsidiary;

Owns a majority interest in; or

Owns as large an ownership interest as any other owner, with a minimum ownership interest of twenty-five percent.

To a family member who is included within the line of intestate succession if the landlord dies intestate;

Between joint tenants or tenants in common; or

Pursuant to eminent domain.

To qualify for an exemption under subsection (12) of this section, a transaction must not be made in bad faith, must be made for a legitimate business purpose or a legitimate familial purpose consistent with the exemptions listed in subsection (12) of this section, and must not be made for the primary purpose of avoiding the opportunity-to-purchase provisions set forth in this section.

Triggering events not essential.

A group or association of home owners or their assignees may submit an offer to purchase to a landlord at any time, even if none of the events listed in subsection (1) or (2) of this section has occurred.

The landlord shall consider in good faith any offer made in accordance with subsection (14)(a) of this section.

The department of local affairs and the office of administrative courts do not have the authority to issue injunctive relief in response to a complaint alleging a violation of this section or to delay a transfer or transaction involving the property, and filing an administrative complaint referencing this section shall not have the effect of doing so.

History.

Source:
L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 1316, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 110, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2010:

(1)(a) and (2) amended,(SB 10-156), ch. 343, p. 1590, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

Entire section R&RE,(HB 20-1201), ch. 196, p. 930, § 2, effective June 30.

38-12-218.
Mobile home owners - right to form a cooperative.

One or more members of a homeowners’ association may, at any time, form a cooperative for the purposes of offering to purchase or finance a mobile home park. A home owner shall be a member of the homeowners’ association in order to participate in the cooperative, and participation in the cooperative shall be voluntary.

History.

Source:
L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 110, § 4, effective August 8.

38-12-219.
Home owners’ and landlords’ rights.

Every home owner and landlord shall have the right to the following:

Protection from abuse or disregard of state or local law by the landlord and home owners;

Peaceful enjoyment of the home owner’s mobile home space, free from unreasonable, arbitrary, or capricious rules and enforcement thereof; and

Tenancy free from harassment or frivolous lawsuits by the landlord and homeowners.

History.

Source:
L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 110, § 4, effective August 8.

38-12-220.
Private civil right of action.

A home owner in a park where the landlord has violated any provision of this article 12 has a private civil right of action against the landlord. In any such action, except as described in section 38-12-105 (4), the home owner is entitled to actual economic damages and reasonable attorney fees and costs if the home owner is successful in the action.

History.

Source:
L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 110, § 4, effective August 8.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (SB 10-156), ch. 343, p. 1591, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-173), ch. 349, p. 2268, § 11, effective October 1.

38-12-221.
Access by counties and municipalities.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon a finding that the utilities in a park create a significant health or safety danger to park residents, the landlord of a mobile home park shall grant county or municipal officers or employees access to the mobile home park for the purposes of investigating or conducting a study related to such danger.

History.

Source:
L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-156), ch. 343, p. 1591, § 11, effective July 1.

38-12-222.
Home owners’ right to privacy.

The management shall respect the privacy of home owners. Except as otherwise provided by law, the management has no right of entry to a mobile home:

Without first obtaining the written consent of the home owner;

As described in subsection (2) of this section;

In the case of an emergency; or

When the mobile home has been abandoned.

A home owner may revoke consent in writing at any time.

Unless otherwise prohibited by law, the management has a right of entry to mobile home space to fulfill the duties described in section 38-12-212.3 and to ensure compliance with applicable codes, statutes, ordinances, and administrative rules; the rental agreement; and the rules and regulations of the park. A landlord shall not enter in a manner that interferes with a home owner’s peaceful enjoyment of the mobile home space, as described in section 38-12-219 (1)(b), except in the case of an emergency.

Except when posting notices that are required by law or by a rental agreement, the management shall make a reasonable effort to notify a home owner of the management’s intention to enter the mobile home space at least forty-eight hours before entry.

History.

Source:
L. 2020:

Entire section added, (HB 20-1196), ch. 195, p. 926, § 14, effective June 30.